Maryland, session 2025, SB0351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
2–402.
(a) (1) In accordance with the State budget, the Secretary shall appoint the
employees that the Secretary considers necessary for the efficient administration of the
Department.
(2) The Secretary shall make each appointment from a list of eligible
candidates in accordance with the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(b) Each CIVILIAN appointee to the Department shall:
(1) be a resident of the State on the date of appointment; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0351*

SENATE BILL 351
(2) have the character, education, and other qualifications established by
the Secretary under this title.
(C) EACH POLICE APPOINTEE TO THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) BE A RESIDENT OF THE STATE OR RESIDE WITHIN 25 MILES
OUTSIDE ITS BORDERS ON THE DATE OF APPOINTMENT AND FOR THE DURATION OF
THE APPOINTEE’S EMPLOYMENT; AND
(2) HAVE THE CHARACTER, EDUCATION, AND OTHER
QUALIFICATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.